Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 10. Reserves.

§ 6.2-1377.
Maintenance of regular reserves; special reserves.

A credit union shall establish and maintain a regular reserve account in accordance with the applicable provisions of Part 702 of the National Credit Union Administration Rules and Regulations, 12 C.F.R. §§ 702.1 through 702.403.

The Commission may increase or decrease the reserve requirement when in its opinion such an increase or decrease is necessary or desirable.

In addition to such regular reserve, special reserves shall be established when found by the board of directors of the credit union or by the Commission to be necessary to protect the interest of members.

Unless otherwise prohibited by the Commission, the board of directors of a credit union may establish the regular reserve in an amount in excess of that required by this section when in its opinion the increased amount is necessary or desirable.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-227; 1964, c. 75; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-218; 1968, c. 560; 1984, c. 410; 1986, c. 146; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.58; 2002, c. 261; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1378.
Use of reserves.

Losses may be charged to the reserve fund. Any sums recovered on items previously charged to it shall be credited to the reserve fund. No dividends shall be paid out of the reserve fund unless the fund, after such payment, exceeds the total amount required to be set aside in the regular reserve and special reserves of the credit union.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-227; 1964, c. 75; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-218; 1968, c. 560; 1984, c. 410; 1986, c. 146; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.59; 2010, c. 794.